District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.02a

Registration of a tenant organization.

In a housing accommodation of 5 or more units, the tenants may form and register the tenant organization with the Mayor, pursuant to § 42-3404.11, at any time; provided, that this section shall not be construed to alter the time periods within which a tenant organization may exercise the rights afforded by this chapter. A tenant organization may file a petition for relief pursuant to § 42-3405.03 or § 42-3405.03a.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 402a, formerly § 402b
as added July 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-15, § 2(c), 52 DCR 6885
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 101(b), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191 renumbered the section.